test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-subst-2tav-o_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - koško:
    koško+N+Sg+Nom:  koško
    koško+N+Sg+Gen:  koˊško
    koško+N+Sg+Acc:  koˊško
    koško+N+Sg+Ill:  kooškon
    koško+N+Sg+Loc:  koškoost
    koško+N+Sg+Com:  koškoin
    koško+N+Sg+Abe:  koˊškottáá
    koško+N+Ess:  košˊkon
    koško+N+Par:  košˊkod
    koško+N+Pl+Nom:  koˊškoh
    koško+N+Pl+Gen:  koˊškoi
    koško+N+Pl+Acc:  koškoid
    koško+N+Pl+Ill:  koškoid
    koško+N+Pl+Loc:  koˊškoin
    koško+N+Pl+Com:  koˊškoiguin
    koško+N+Pl+Abe:  koˊškoittáá

  Noun - kolo:
    kolo+N+Sg+Nom:  koˊḷo
    kolo+N+Sg+Gen:  koˊlo
    kolo+N+Sg+Acc:  koˊlo
    kolo+N+Sg+Ill:  koˊḷon
    kolo+N+Sg+Loc:  kooloost
    kolo+N+Sg+Com:  koˊloin
    kolo+N+Sg+Abe:  koˊlottáá
    kolo+N+Ess:  kolloon
    kolo+N+Par:  kollood
    kolo+N+Pl+Nom:  koˊloh
    kolo+N+Pl+Gen:  koˊloi
    kolo+N+Pl+Acc:  koˊloid
    kolo+N+Pl+Ill:  koˊloid
    kolo+N+Pl+Loc:  koˊloin
    kolo+N+Pl+Com:  koˊloiguin
    kolo+N+Pl+Abe:  koˊloittáá

  Noun - ronno:
    ronno+N+Sg+Nom:  ronno
    ronno+N+Sg+Gen:  roˊṇo
    ronno+N+Sg+Acc:  roˊṇo
    ronno+N+Sg+Ill:  rooṇon
    ronno+N+Sg+Loc:  ronnoost
    ronno+N+Sg+Com:  ronnoin
    ronno+N+Sg+Abe:  roˊṇottáá
    ronno+N+Ess:  ronnon
    ronno+N+Par:  ronnod
    ronno+N+Pl+Nom:  roˊṇoh
    ronno+N+Pl+Gen:  roˊṇoi
    ronno+N+Pl+Acc:  ronnoid
    ronno+N+Pl+Ill:  ronnoid
    ronno+N+Pl+Loc:  ronnoin
    ronno+N+Pl+Com:  roˊnoiguin
    ronno+N+Pl+Abe:  roˊnoittáá

  Noun - joto:
    joto+N+Sg+Nom:  joto
    joto+N+Sg+Gen:  joˊđo
    joto+N+Sg+Acc:  joˊđo
    joto+N+Sg+Ill:  joton
    joto+N+Sg+Loc:  joođoost
    joto+N+Sg+Com:  joˊđoin
    joto+N+Sg+Abe:  joˊđottáá
    joto+N+Ess:  jottoon
    joto+N+Par:  jottood
    joto+N+Pl+Nom:  joˊđoh
    joto+N+Pl+Gen:  joˊđoi
    joto+N+Pl+Acc:  joˊđoid
    joto+N+Pl+Ill:  joˊđoid
    joto+N+Pl+Loc:  joˊđoin
    joto+N+Pl+Com:  joˊđoiguin
    joto+N+Pl+Abe:  joˊđoittáá

  Noun - roto:
    roto+N+Sg+Nom:  roto
    roto+N+Sg+Gen:  roˊđo
    roto+N+Sg+Acc:  roˊđo
    roto+N+Sg+Ill:  roton
    roto+N+Sg+Loc:  roođoost
    roto+N+Sg+Com:  roˊđoin
    roto+N+Sg+Abe:  roˊđottáá
    roto+N+Ess:  rottoon
    roto+N+Par:  rottood
    roto+N+Pl+Nom:  roˊđoh
    roto+N+Pl+Gen:  roˊđoi
    roto+N+Pl+Acc:  roˊđoid
    roto+N+Pl+Ill:  roˊđoid
    roto+N+Pl+Loc:  roˊđoin
    roto+N+Pl+Com:  roˊđoiguin
    roto+N+Pl+Abe:  roˊđoiguin

  Noun - potto:
    potto+N+Sg+Nom:  potto
    potto+N+Sg+Gen:  poˊto
    potto+N+Sg+Acc:  poˊto
    potto+N+Sg+Ill:  pooton
    potto+N+Sg+Loc:  pottoost
    potto+N+Sg+Com:  pottoin
    potto+N+Sg+Abe:  poˊtottáá
    potto+N+Ess:  potton
    potto+N+Par:  pottod
    potto+N+Pl+Nom:  poˊtoh
    potto+N+Pl+Gen:  poˊtoi
    potto+N+Pl+Acc:  pottoid
    potto+N+Pl+Ill:  pottoid
    potto+N+Pl+Loc:  poˊtoin
    potto+N+Pl+Com:  poˊtoiguin
    potto+N+Pl+Abe:  poˊtoittáá

  Noun - torvo:
    torvo+N+Sg+Nom:  torvo
    torvo+N+Sg+Gen:  toˊrvo
    torvo+N+Sg+Acc:  toˊrvo
    torvo+N+Sg+Ill:  toorvon
    torvo+N+Sg+Loc:  torvoost
    torvo+N+Sg+Com:  torvoin
    torvo+N+Sg+Abe:  toˊrvottáá
    torvo+N+Ess:  torvon
    torvo+N+Par:  torvod
    torvo+N+Pl+Nom:  toˊrvoh
    torvo+N+Pl+Gen:  toˊrvoi
    torvo+N+Pl+Acc:  torvoid
    torvo+N+Pl+Ill:  torvoid
    torvo+N+Pl+Loc:  toˊrvoin
    torvo+N+Pl+Com:  toˊrvoiguin
    torvo+N+Pl+Abe:  toˊrvoittáá

  Noun - kođo:
    kođo+N+Sg+Nom:  kođ̣o
    kođo+N+Sg+Gen:  koˊđo
    kođo+N+Sg+Acc:  koˊđo
    kođo+N+Sg+Ill:  kođ̣on
    kođo+N+Sg+Loc:  koođoost
    kođo+N+Sg+Com:  koˊđoin
    kođo+N+Sg+Abe:  koˊđottáá
    kođo+N+Ess:  kođđoon
    kođo+N+Par:  kođđood
    kođo+N+Pl+Nom:  koˊđoh
    kođo+N+Pl+Gen:  koˊđoi
    kođo+N+Pl+Acc:  koˊđoid
    kođo+N+Pl+Ill:  koˊđoid
    kođo+N+Pl+Loc:  koˊđoin
    kođo+N+Pl+Com:  koˊđoiguin
    kođo+N+Pl+Abe:  koˊđoittáá

  Noun - uddo:
    uddo+N+Sg+Nom:  uddo
    uddo+N+Sg+Gen:  uˊdo
    uddo+N+Sg+Acc:  uˊdo
    uddo+N+Sg+Ill:  uudon
    uddo+N+Sg+Loc:  uddoost
    uddo+N+Sg+Com:  uddoin
    uddo+N+Sg+Abe:  uˊdottáá
    uddo+N+Ess:  uddon
    uddo+N+Par:  uddod
    uddo+N+Pl+Nom:  uˊdoh
    uddo+N+Pl+Gen:  uˊdoi
    uddo+N+Pl+Acc:  uddoid
    uddo+N+Pl+Ill:  uddoid
    uddo+N+Pl+Loc:  uˊdoin
    uddo+N+Pl+Com:  uˊdoiguin
    uddo+N+Pl+Abe:  uˊdoittáá

  Noun - muddo:
    muddo+N+Sg+Nom:  muddo
    muddo+N+Sg+Gen:  muˊdo
    muddo+N+Sg+Acc:  muˊdo
    muddo+N+Sg+Ill:  muudon
    muddo+N+Sg+Loc:  muddoost
    muddo+N+Sg+Com:  muddoin
    muddo+N+Sg+Abe:  muˊdottáá
    muddo+N+Ess:  muddon
    muddo+N+Par:  muddod
    muddo+N+Pl+Nom:  muˊdoh
    muddo+N+Pl+Gen:  muˊdoi
    muddo+N+Pl+Acc:  muddoid
    muddo+N+Pl+Ill:  muddoid
    muddo+N+Pl+Loc:  muˊdoin
    muddo+N+Pl+Com:  muˊdoiguin
    muddo+N+Pl+Abe:  muˊdoittáá

  Noun - puddo:
    puddo+N+Sg+Nom:  puddo
    puddo+N+Sg+Gen:  puˊdo
    puddo+N+Sg+Acc:  puˊdo
    puddo+N+Sg+Ill:  puudon
    puddo+N+Sg+Loc:  puddoost
    puddo+N+Sg+Com:  puddoin
    puddo+N+Sg+Abe:  puˊdottáá
    puddo+N+Ess:  puddon
    puddo+N+Par:  puddod
    puddo+N+Pl+Nom:  puˊdoh
    puddo+N+Pl+Gen:  puˊdoi
    puddo+N+Pl+Acc:  puddoid
    puddo+N+Pl+Ill:  puddoid
    puddo+N+Pl+Loc:  puˊdoin
    puddo+N+Pl+Com:  puˊdoiguin
    puddo+N+Pl+Abe:  puˊdoittáá

  Noun - suddo:
    suddo+N+Sg+Nom:  suddo
    suddo+N+Sg+Gen:  suˊdo
    suddo+N+Sg+Acc:  suˊdo
    suddo+N+Sg+Ill:  suudon
    suddo+N+Sg+Loc:  suddoost
    suddo+N+Sg+Com:  suddoin
    suddo+N+Sg+Abe:  suˊdottáá
    suddo+N+Ess:  suddon
    suddo+N+Par:  suddod
    suddo+N+Pl+Nom:  suˊdoh
    suddo+N+Pl+Gen:  suˊdoi
    suddo+N+Pl+Acc:  suddoid
    suddo+N+Pl+Ill:  suddoid
    suddo+N+Pl+Loc:  suˊdoin
    suddo+N+Pl+Com:  suˊdoiguin
    suddo+N+Pl+Abe:  suˊdoittáá

  Noun - purdo:
    purdo+N+Sg+Nom:  purdo
    purdo+N+Sg+Gen:  puˊrdo
    purdo+N+Sg+Acc:  puˊrdo
    purdo+N+Sg+Ill:  puurdon
    purdo+N+Sg+Loc:  purdoost
    purdo+N+Sg+Com:  purdoin
    purdo+N+Sg+Abe:  puˊrdottáá
    purdo+N+Ess:  purdon
    purdo+N+Par:  purdod
    purdo+N+Pl+Nom:  puˊrdoh
    purdo+N+Pl+Gen:  puˊrdoi
    purdo+N+Pl+Acc:  purdoid
    purdo+N+Pl+Ill:  purdoid
    purdo+N+Pl+Loc:  puˊrdoin
    purdo+N+Pl+Com:  puˊrdoiguin
    purdo+N+Pl+Abe:  puˊrdoittáá

  Noun - ruŋgo:
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Nom:  ruŋgo
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Gen:  ruˊŋgo
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Acc:  ruˊŋgo
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Ill:  ruuŋgon
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Loc:  ruŋgoost
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Com:  ruŋgoin
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Abe:  ruˊŋgottáá
    ruŋgo+N+Ess:  ruŋgon
    ruŋgo+N+Par:  ruŋgod
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Nom:  ruˊŋgoh
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Gen:  ruˊŋgoi
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Acc:  ruŋgoid
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Ill:  ruŋgoid
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Loc:  ruˊŋgoin
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Com:  ruˊŋgoiguin
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Abe:  ruˊŋgoittáá

  Noun - urkko:
    urkko+N+Sg+Nom:  urkko
    urkko+N+Sg+Gen:  uˊrko
    urkko+N+Sg+Acc:  uˊrko
    urkko+N+Sg+Ill:  uurkon
    urkko+N+Sg+Loc:  urkkoost
    urkko+N+Sg+Com:  urkkoin
    urkko+N+Sg+Abe:  uˊrkottáá
    urkko+N+Ess:  urkkon
    urkko+N+Par:  urkkod
    urkko+N+Pl+Nom:  uˊrkoh
    urkko+N+Pl+Gen:  uˊrkoi
    urkko+N+Pl+Acc:  urkkoid
    urkko+N+Pl+Ill:  urkkoid
    urkko+N+Pl+Loc:  uˊrkoin
    urkko+N+Pl+Com:  uˊrkoiguin
    urkko+N+Pl+Abe:  uˊrkoittáá

  Noun - lukko:
    lukko+N+Sg+Nom:  lukko
    lukko+N+Sg+Gen:  luˊho
    lukko+N+Sg+Acc:  luˊho
    lukko+N+Sg+Ill:  luukon
    lukko+N+Sg+Loc:  luhhoost
    lukko+N+Sg+Com:  luhhoin
    lukko+N+Sg+Abe:  luˊhottáá
    lukko+N+Ess:  lukkon
    lukko+N+Par:  lukkod
    lukko+N+Pl+Nom:  luˊhoh
    lukko+N+Pl+Gen:  luˊhoi
    lukko+N+Pl+Acc:  luˊhoid
    lukko+N+Pl+Ill:  luhhoid
    lukko+N+Pl+Loc:  luˊhoin
    lukko+N+Pl+Com:  luˊhoiguin
    lukko+N+Pl+Abe:  luˊhoittáá

  Noun - puško:
    puško+N+Sg+Nom:  puško
    puško+N+Sg+Gen:  puˊško
    puško+N+Sg+Acc:  puˊško
    puško+N+Sg+Ill:  puuškon
    puško+N+Sg+Loc:  puškoost
    puško+N+Sg+Com:  puškoin
    puško+N+Sg+Abe:  puˊškottáá
    puško+N+Ess:  puškon
    puško+N+Par:  puškod
    puško+N+Pl+Nom:  puˊškoh
    puško+N+Pl+Gen:  puˊškoi
    puško+N+Pl+Acc:  puškoid
    puško+N+Pl+Ill:  puškoid
    puško+N+Pl+Loc:  puˊškoin
    puško+N+Pl+Com:  puˊškoiguin
    puško+N+Pl+Abe:  puˊškoittáá

  Noun - ullo:
    ullo+N+Sg+Nom:  ullo
    ullo+N+Sg+Gen:  uˊḷo
    ullo+N+Sg+Acc:  uˊḷo
    ullo+N+Sg+Ill:  uuḷon
    ullo+N+Sg+Loc:  ulloost
    ullo+N+Sg+Com:  ulloin
    ullo+N+Sg+Abe:  uˊḷottáá
    ullo+N+Ess:  ullon
    ullo+N+Par:  ullod
    ullo+N+Pl+Nom:  uˊḷoh
    ullo+N+Pl+Gen:  uˊḷoi
    ullo+N+Pl+Acc:  ulloid
    ullo+N+Pl+Ill:  ulloid
    ullo+N+Pl+Loc:  uˊḷoin
    ullo+N+Pl+Com:  uˊloiguin
    ullo+N+Pl+Abe:  uˊloittáá

  Noun - kulo:
    kulo+N+Sg+Nom:  kuˊḷo
    kulo+N+Sg+Gen:  kuˊlo
    kulo+N+Sg+Acc:  kuˊlo
    kulo+N+Sg+Ill:  kuˊḷon
    kulo+N+Sg+Loc:  kuuloost
    kulo+N+Sg+Com:  kuˊloin
    kulo+N+Sg+Abe:  kuˊlottáá
    kulo+N+Ess:  kulloon
    kulo+N+Par:  kullood
    kulo+N+Pl+Nom:  kuˊloh
    kulo+N+Pl+Gen:  kuˊloi
    kulo+N+Pl+Acc:  kuˊloid
    kulo+N+Pl+Ill:  kuˊloid
    kulo+N+Pl+Loc:  kuˊloin
    kulo+N+Pl+Com:  kuˊloiguin
    kulo+N+Pl+Abe:  kuˊloittáá

  Noun - humo:
    humo+N+Sg+Nom:  huṃo
    humo+N+Sg+Gen:  huˊmo
    humo+N+Sg+Acc:  huˊmo
    humo+N+Sg+Ill:  huuṃon
    humo+N+Sg+Loc:  huumoost
    humo+N+Sg+Com:  huˊmoin
    humo+N+Sg+Abe:  huˊmottáá
    humo+N+Ess:  hummoon
    humo+N+Par:  hummood
    humo+N+Pl+Nom:  huˊmoh
    humo+N+Pl+Gen:  huˊmoi
    humo+N+Pl+Acc:  huˊmoid
    humo+N+Pl+Ill:  humoid
    humo+N+Pl+Loc:  huˊmoin
    humo+N+Pl+Com:  huˊmoiguin
    humo+N+Pl+Abe:  huˊmoittáá

  Noun - sutto:
    sutto+N+Sg+Nom:  sutto
    sutto+N+Sg+Gen:  suˊto
    sutto+N+Sg+Acc:  suˊto
    sutto+N+Sg+Ill:  suuton
    sutto+N+Sg+Loc:  suttoost
    sutto+N+Sg+Com:  suttoin
    sutto+N+Sg+Abe:  suˊtottáá
    sutto+N+Ess:  sutton
    sutto+N+Par:  suttod
    sutto+N+Pl+Nom:  suˊtoh
    sutto+N+Pl+Gen:  suˊtoi
    sutto+N+Pl+Acc: suttoid
    sutto+N+Pl+Ill:  suttoid
    sutto+N+Pl+Loc:  suˊtoin
    sutto+N+Pl+Com:  suˊtoiguin
    sutto+N+Pl+Abe:  suˊtoittáá

  Noun - mušto:
    mušto+N+Sg+Nom:  mušto
    mušto+N+Sg+Gen:  muˊšto
    mušto+N+Sg+Acc:  muˊšto
    mušto+N+Sg+Ill:  muušton
    mušto+N+Sg+Loc:  muštoost
    mušto+N+Sg+Com:  muštoin
    mušto+N+Sg+Abe:  muˊštottáá
    mušto+N+Ess:  mušton
    mušto+N+Par:  muštod
    mušto+N+Pl+Nom:  muˊštoh
    mušto+N+Pl+Gen:  muˊštoi
    mušto+N+Pl+Acc:  muštoid
    mušto+N+Pl+Ill:  muštoid
    mušto+N+Pl+Loc:  muˊštoin
    mušto+N+Pl+Com:  muˊštoiguin
    mušto+N+Pl+Abe:  muˊštoittáá

  Noun - euro:
    euro+N+Sg+Nom:  euro
    euro+N+Sg+Gen:  euro
    euro+N+Sg+Acc:  euro
    euro+N+Sg+Ill:  euron
    euro+N+Sg+Loc:  eurost
    euro+N+Sg+Com:  euroin
    euro+N+Sg+Abe:  eurottáá
    euro+N+Ess:  euron
    euro+N+Pl+Nom:  euroh
    euro+N+Pl+Gen:  euroi
    euro+N+Pl+Acc:  euroid
    euro+N+Pl+Ill:  euroid
    euro+N+Pl+Loc:  euroin
    euro+N+Pl+Com:  euroiguin
    euro+N+Pl+Abe:  euroittáá
